Utah statutes.
72-10-208.   Providing for levying of taxes.

The local public authorities having power to appropriate money within the counties, municipalities, or other public subdivisions of this state for the purpose of acquiring, establishing, developing, operating, maintaining, or controlling airports  under the provisions of this part, are authorized to appropriate and cause to be raised by taxation or otherwise in such political subdivisions money sufficient to carry out therein the provisions of this part, also to use for such purpose or purposes money derived from the airports.

